Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321.177, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 10. To any person to operate a commercial motor vehicle if the person fails to demonstrate proficiency in the English language under section 321.187B, subsection 1. Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 321.187B English language proficiency examinations for commercial drivers. 1. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , the department shall examine the English language proficiency of each person who applies for issuance or renewal of a commercial driverâs license or commercial learnerâs permit. The examination must require the person to demonstrate proficiency in the English language sufficient to meet the requirements of 49 C.F.R. Â§391.11(b)(2). The department shall administer the examination in a computer-based format. b. The department shall not examine an applicantâs English language proficiency if the applicant submits proof, as determined by the department, that the applicant is sufficiently proficient in the English language by having previously successfully completed the examination required under paragraph âaâ . Senate File 2426, p. 2 c. The department shall deny the issuance or renewal of a commercial driverâs license or commercial learnerâs permit unless the person applying for or renewing the license or permit submits satisfactory proof, as determined by the department, that the person is sufficiently proficient in the English language based on successful completion of the examination required under paragraph âaâ . d. An applicant shall not be prohibited from retaking the examination under paragraph âaâ , subject to the availability of the examination as determined by the department. e. The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this subsection. 2. The department shall not comply with a provision of this section if compliance would cause the denial of federal funds or services or otherwise violate federal law. The department shall comply with federal law to the extent necessary to prevent the denial of federal funds or services. Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 321.449C English language proficiency ââ commercial drivers and commercial motor carriers. 1. A person who is not able to demonstrate proficiency in the English language sufficient to meet the requirements of 49 C.F.R. Â§391.11(b)(2) shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , a person who violates this subsection commits a serious misdemeanor. The court shall impose a fine of one thousand dollars and the court may order imprisonment not to exceed one year. b. In lieu of the criminal penalty under paragraph âaâ , a peace officer shall issue an out-of-service order to a person who violates this subsection if the person holds an unexpired commercial driverâs license or commercial learnerâs permit that was issued by the department after the person successfully completed the English language proficiency examination under section 321.187B, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 2. a. A commercial motor carrier shall not employ or engage the services of a commercial driver, including as an independent contractor, who is not sufficiently proficient in the English language in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Â§391.11(b)(2). A carrier who violates this subsection commits Senate File 2426, p. 3 a simple misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation under section 805.8A, subsection 13, paragraph â0câ . Each person employed or engaged in violation of this subsection constitutes a separate offense. b. (1) In addition to any other penalty, a peace officer shall issue an out-of-service order to a commercial motor carrier if an investigation, safety audit, or normal business activity reveals any of the following: (a) That the carrier is allowing, or has allowed within the previous twelve months, a person who is not sufficiently proficient in the English language in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Â§391.11(b)(2) to operate a commercial motor vehicle. (b) That the carrier was issued an out-of-service order by another state or the federal motor carrier safety administration for allowing a person who is not sufficiently proficient in the English language in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Â§391.11(b)(2) to operate a commercial motor vehicle. (2) An out-of-service order issued under this paragraph applies only in this state and prohibits the commercial motor carrier, including an employee or independent contractor of the carrier, from operating a commercial motor vehicle owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the carrier in this state until the violation has been corrected or the fine has been paid, as applicable. 3. a. The commercial motor carrier who employed or engaged the services of a person, including as an independent contractor, who was operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of subsection 1 and the owner of any cargo being transported in the commercial vehicle shall be notified of the vehicleâs location by the officer who made the stop. The carrier or owner of the cargo may arrange for another person who is a commercial driver with sufficient proficiency in the English language to take possession of the vehicle or transfer the cargo to another vehicle, as applicable. b. If a commercial vehicle is removed from a highway in response to a violation of this section, the state, the local authority, and the owner of the cargo inside the vehicle shall not be liable for any damages that result from the removal, or for any reasonable action to transfer such cargo. Senate File 2426, p. 4 4. The department of public safety and a person whose duty includes enforcing this section shall cease all actions relating to enforcing a provision of this section if enforcing the provision would cause the denial of federal funds or services or otherwise violate federal law. Sec. 4. Section 805.8A, subsection 13, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. For each violation of section 321.449C, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ , the scheduled fine is ten thousand dollars. Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. The section of this Act enacting section 321.187B applies on and after March 1, 2027, or the date the department of transportation submits to the Iowa administrative code editor for publication in the Iowa administrative bulletin a statement by the director of transportation that the applicable phase of the department of transportationâs new records system is implemented, whichever is earlier. The department shall also forward a copy of the statement to the Iowa Code editor. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2426, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor